Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2706
Equity purchaser, defined.

Equity purchaser means a person who, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, acquires title to a residence in foreclosure. Equity purchaser does not include a person who acquires such title:

(1) For the purpose of using such property as his or her personal residence for at least one year;

(2) By a deed in lieu of foreclosure to the holder of an evidence of debt, or an associate of the holder of an evidence of debt, of a consensual lien or encumbrance of record, if such consensual lien or encumbrance is recorded in the register of deeds office of the county where the residence in foreclosure is located prior to a foreclosure sale;

(3) By a deed from any trustee, sheriff, or other person appointed by a court as a result of a foreclosure sale;

(4) At a sale of property authorized by statute;

(5) By order or judgment of any court;

(6) From the person's spouse, relative, or relative of a spouse, by the half or whole blood or by adoption, or from a guardian, conservator, or personal representative of such person; or

(7) While performing services as a part of a person's normal business activities under any law of this state or the United States that regulates banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, insurance companies, title insurers, insurance producers, or escrow companies authorized to conduct business in this state, an affiliate or subsidiary of such person, or an employee or agent acting on behalf of such person.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 6.
July 18, 2008